Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1220
Possession of a destructive device; penalty; permit or license for explosive materials; no defense.

(1) Any person who has in his possession a destructive device, as defined in subdivision (7) of section 28-1213, commits the offense of possession of a destructive device.

(2) A permit or license issued under any state or federal law to possess, own, use, distribute, sell, manufacture, store, or handle in any manner explosive materials shall not be a defense to the crime of possession of a destructive device as defined in this section.

(3) Possession of a destructive device is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 252.

Possession of each destructive device constitutes a separate offense. State v. Spurgin, 261 Neb. 427, 623 N.W.2d 644 (2001).